Utah statutes.
57-8-14.   Legal description of units.

(1)  A deed, lease, mortgage, or other instrument may legally describe a unit by its identifying number or symbol as designated in the declaration or as shown on the condominium plat.

(2)  Each description under Subsection (1) shall be considered:

(a)  to be good and sufficient for all purposes; and

(b)  to convey, transfer, encumber or otherwise affect the unit owner's corresponding percentage of ownership in the common or community areas and facilities even though the percentage of ownership is not expressly mentioned or described.



Amended by Chapter 268, 2007 General Session

